usr/share/texmf-texlive/tex/generic/hyphen/glhyph.tex
% glhyph.tex Version 1.0
% Hyphenation patterns for Galician.
%
% Based on the work by Javier Bezos and CervanTeX (eshyph.tex)
% Adapted to Galician.
%
% (c) Javier Múgica 2006
% License: LPPL
% Some parts (most parts): esphyph.tex, (c) Javier Bezos and CervanTeX 2001-2006, Licence: LPPL
%
% LPPL maintenance status: maintained
% Current Maintainer: Javier Múgica
%
%	For bug reports and comments:
%
%	Javier Múgica,   javier@digi21.net
%
%
% Note that there is no 'j' nor 'y' in Galician

\catcode`\^^e1=11 \lccode`\^^e1=`\^^e1    % 'a
\catcode`\^^e9=11 \lccode`\^^e9=`\^^e9    % 'e
\catcode`\^^ed=11 \lccode`\^^ed=`\^^ed    % 'i
\catcode`\^^f1=11 \lccode`\^^f1=`\^^f1    % 'o
\catcode`\^^f3=11 \lccode`\^^f3=`\^^f3    % ~n
\catcode`\^^fa=11 \lccode`\^^fa=`\^^fa    % 'u
\catcode`\^^fc=11 \lccode`\^^fc=`\^^fc    % "u
\patterns{
1ñ
1b 2bb 2bc 2bd 2bf 2bg 2b1h 2bk b2l 2bl. 2bm 2bn 2bp 2bq b2r 2br. 2bs 2bt 2bv 2bw 2bx 2by 2bz
1c 2cb 2cc 2cd 2cf 2cg c4h 2ch. c2k c2l 2cl. 2cm 2cn 2cp 2cq c2r 2cr. 2cs 2ct 2cv 2cw 2cx 2cz
1d 2db 2dc 2dd 2df 2dg 2d1h 2dk 2dl 2dm 2dn 2dp 2dq d2r 2dr. 2ds 2dt 2dv 2dw 2dx 2dy 2dz
1f 2fb 2fc 2fd 2ff 2fg 2f1h 2fk f2l 2fl. 2fm 2fn 2fp 2fq f2r 2fr. 2fs 2ft 2fv 2fw 2fx 2fz
1g 2gb 2gc 2gd 2gf 2gg 2g2h 2gk g2l 2gl. 2gm 2gn 2gp 2gq g2r 2gr. 2gs 2gt 2gv 2gw 2gx 2gz
2hb 2hc 2hd 2hf 2hg 2h1h 2hk 2hl 2hm 2hn 2hp 2hq 2hr 2hs 2ht 2hv 2hw 2hx 2hy 2hz
1k 2kb 2kc 2kd 2kf 2kg 2k2h 2kk k2l 2kl. 2km 2kn 2kp 2kq k2r 2kr. 2ks 2kt 2kv 2kw 2kx 2kz
1l 2lb 2lc 2ld 2lf 2lg 2l1h 2lk l4l 2ll. 2lm 2ln 2lp 2lq 2lr 2ls 2lt 2lv 2lw 2lx 2lz
1m 2mb 2mc 2md 2mf 2mg 2m1h 2mk 2ml 2mm 2mn 2mp 2mq 2mr 2ms 2mt 2mv 2mw 2mx 2mz
1n 2nb 2nc 2nd 2nf 2ng 2n1h 2nk 2nl 2nm 2nn 2np 2nq 2nr 2ns 2nt 2nv 2nw 2nx 2nz
1p 2pb 2pc 2pd 2pf 2pg 2p1h 2pk p2l 2pl. 2pm 2pn 2pp 2pq p2r 2pr. 2ps 2pt 2pv 2pw 2px 2pz
1q 2qb 2qc 2qd 2qf 2qg 2q1h 2qk 2ql 2qm 2qn 2qp 2qq 2qr 2qs 2qt 2qv 2qw 2qx 2qz
1r 2rb 2rc 2rd 2rf 2rg 2r1h 2rk 2rl 2rm 2rn 2rp 2rq r2r 2rr. 2rs 2rt 2rv 2rw 2rx 2rz
1s 2sb 2sc 2sd 2sf 2sg 2s1h 2sk 2sl 2sm 2sn 2sp 2sq 2sr 2ss 2st 2sv 2sw 2sx 2sz
1t 2tb 2tc 2td 2tf 2tg 2t1h 2tk 2tm 2tn 2tp 2tq t2r 2tr. 2ts 2tt 2tv 2tw t2x 2tz
1v 2vb 2vc 2vd 2vf 2vg 2v1h 2vk v2l 2vl. 2vm 2vn 2vp 2vq v2r 2vr. 2vs 2vt 2vv 2vw 2vx 2vz
1w 2wb 2wc 2wd 2wf 2wg 2w1h 2wk w2l 2wl. 2wm 2wn 2wp 2wq w2r 2wr. 2ws 2wt 2wv 2ww 2wx 2wz
1x 2xb 2xc 2xd 2xf 2xg 2x1h 2xk 2xl 2xm 2xn 2xp 2xq 2xr 2xs 2xt 2xv 2xw 2xx 2xz
1z 2zb 2zc 2zd 2zf 2zg 2z1h 2zk 2zl 2zm 2zn 2zp 2zq 2zr 2zs 2zt 2zv 2zw 2zx 2zz
2t2l
2b3p2t 2c3p2t 2d3p2t 2l3p2t 2m3p2t 2n3p2t 2r3p2t 2s3p2t 2t3p2t 2x3p2t 4pt.
2b3c2t 2c3c2t 2d3c2t 2l3c2t 2m3c2t 2n3c2t 2r3c2t 2s3c2t 2t3c2t 2x3c2t 4ct.
2b3c2n 2c3c2n 2d3c2n 2l3c2n 2m3c2n 2n3c2n 2r3c2n 2s3c2n 2t3c2n 2x3c2n 4cn.
2b3p2s 2c3p2s 2d3p2s 2l3p2s 2m3p2s 2n3p2s 2r3p2s 2s3p2s 2t3p2s 2x3p2s 4pc.
2b3m2n 2c3m2n 2d3m2n 2l3m2n 2m3m2n 2n3m2n 2r3m2n 2s3m2n 2t3m2n 2x3m2n 4mn.
2b3g2n 2c3g2n 2d3g2n 2l3g2n 2m3g2n 2n3g2n 2r3g2n 2s3g2n 2t3g2n 2x3g2n 4gn.
2b3f2t 2c3f2t 2d3f2t 2l3f2t 2m3f2t 2n3f2t 2r3f2t 2s3f2t 2t3f2t 2x3f2t 4ft.
2b3p2n 2c3p2n 2d3p2n 2l3p2n 2m3p2n 2n3p2n 2r3p2n 2s3p2n 2t3p2n 2x3p2n 4pn.
2b3c2z 2c3c2z 2d3c2z 2l3c2z 2m3c2z 2n3c2z 2r3c2z 2s3c2z 2t3c2z 2x3c2z 4cz.
2b3t2z 2c3t2z 2d3t2z 2l3t2z 2m3t2z 2n3t2z 2r3t2z 2s3t2z 2t3t2z 2x3t2z 4tz.
2b3t2s 2c3t2s 2d3t2s 2l3t2s 2m3t2s 2n3t2s 2r3t2s 2s3t2s 2t3t2s 2x3t2s 4ts.
san4c5t
plan4c5t
% Do no break the group unha
un2ha
% We now avoid some problematic breaks.
2non. .non4
su2b2r su2b2l
% Avoid ugly breaks
4caca4 4cago4 4caga4 4cagas. 
4peido. 4peidos.
4puta4 4puto4
4cona.
}
